tests/test_files/apertium-kaz.kaz.lexc
LEXICON CLITICS-INCL-COP         ! Can appear only after nominals
                                 ! (and only after some cases).
CLITICS-NO-COP ;
CLIT-COP ;

!==============================================================================!
!                         NOMINAL INFLECTION
! This section contains everything needed to describe inflection of nominals.
! It starts with the LEXICON FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION
!==============================================================================!

!-------------------------------------------------------------------------------
! The following combinations are possible (examples in Tatar):
!
! stem(plural) > case                                     # әти<nom>, әтине<acc>
!----
! stem(plural) > possessives > case                       !# әтиемне<px1sg><acc>
! stem(plural) > possessives > ныкы/дагы/дай(*1)
                                               !# әтиемнеке,китабындагы,әтиемдәй
! stem(plural) > possessives > ныкы > case
! stem(plural) > possessives > дагы(plural(*2)) > case
                                   !# Монда _эчеңдәгене_ тышка чыгарырга ярамый.
! stem(plural) > possessives > дагы(plural) > possessives > case
                     !# _Эчендәгесе_(*3) – тышында, диләр андый кешеләр турында.
!----
! stem(plural) > ныкы/дагы/дай                         !# әтинеке/әтидәге/әтидәй
! stem(plural) > ныкы/дагы > case  !#Бу соңгы _еллардагының_ өчтән икесе чамасы.
!-----
! stem(plural) > сыз
! stem > сыз(plural) > case
! stem > сыз(plural) > possessives > case
!----
! *1. "ныкы" form in some Tatar grammars is called "predicative genitive".
!     Indeed, when not substantivized, it is used as a predicate:
!     "Бу яулык әнинеке." (vs "Әнинең яулыгы.)
!
!     Currently we don't mark it with a <subst> tag, but probably we should,
!     since we let it continue with case tags.
!
!     An alternative to a [predicative general possessive <px>] vs
!     [substantivized general possessive <px>subst>] opposition is to view it as
!     an always substantivized thing and hence mark it with a <subst> tag
!     (see e.g. http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Turkic_languages/Ki)
!     At the end of sentences it will have attached copulas, which will indicate
!     predicative use anyway.
! *2. TODO: Does double plural in a word make sence? Ерак илләрдәгеләр looks ok,
!     and occurs in the RFERL copus (though very rarely). Plural affix both
!     before and after the the general possessive does not look ok.
! *3. This doesn't work atm (it's recursive), but it doesn't seem to be very
!     frequent also.
!     Most likely it is restricted to px3sp.
!-------------------------------------------------------------------------------

!-------------------------------------------------------------------------------
! A note on abessive SIZ:
! It doesn't appear after possessives.
! We don't let it take copula suffixes here. A counterexample could be e.g.
! "жұмыс-сыз-бын", but that's only because "жұмыссыз" has lexicalized as an
! adjective (try to grep "с[ыі]з[мбп][ыі]н" on a large corpora -- that's just a
! few words which are rather  adjectives.
!-------------------------------------------------------------------------------

LEXICON CASES-COMMON

%<gen%>:%>%{N%}%{I%}ң CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<dat%>:%>%{G%}%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<acc%>:%>%{N%}%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<ins%>:%>%{M%}ен CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<ins%>:%>%{M%}енен CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR

LEXICON CASES

CASES-COMMON ;
%<nom%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}н CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} CLITICS-INCL-COP ;

!! LEXICON CASES-WITHOUT-COPULAS
!! 
!! CASES-COMMON ;
!! %<nom%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
!! %<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}н CLITICS-NO-COP ;
!! %<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON ATTR-SUBST

%<attr%>: # ;
%<subst%>: CASES ;
%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASES ;

LEXICON GENERAL-POSSESSIVE-ETC

!------------------------------------------------------------------------------!
! <n.pl.нікі.pl> sequence should not be allowed. This form is rare (1 (!)
! match in RFERL corpus for 'нікілар'), probably not worh bothering at all.
! It could be handled in a way abessive is handled, but since NIKI in contrast
! to the abessive SIZ can appear after possessves, that would require
! duplicating possessives as well.
!------------------------------------------------------------------------------!
! try нікілер?  -JNW

!gen.subst part was:
!%<px%>:%>%{N%}ікі%{n%} CASES ;
!%<px%>%<pl%>:%>%{N%}ікі%>л%{A%}р CASES ;

%<gen%>%<subst%>:%>%{N%}ікі%{n%} CASES ;
%<gen%>%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{N%}ікі%>л%{A%}р CASES ;

%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}%{G%}%{I%} ATTR-SUBST ;
%<sim%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}й CLITICS-NO-COP ;  ! Probably should be CLITICS-INCL-COP, same for all <sim> -JNW 2015-01-17

LEXICON CASES-ETC

CASES ;
GENERAL-POSSESSIVE-ETC ;

LEXICON POSSESSIVES

%<px1sg%>:%>%{I%}м CASES-ETC ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{I%}ң CASES-ETC ;
%<px3sp%>:%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES-ETC ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{I%}м%{I%}з CASES-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{I%}ңд%{A%}р CASES-ETC ;

%<px2sg%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з CASES-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>%<frm%>:%{I%}ң%{I%}зд%{A%}р CASES-ETC ;

LEXICON ABESSIVE-POSTPOSITION

%+сыз%<post%>:%>с%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON LI-POSTPOSITION

%+лы%<post%>:%>%{L%}%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON PLURAL

%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASES-ETC ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р POSSESSIVES ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р ABESSIVE-POSTPOSITION ;

LEXICON FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION

PLURAL ;
CASES-ETC ;
POSSESSIVES ;
ABESSIVE-POSTPOSITION ;
LI-POSTPOSITION ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     ADJECTIVE'S (ADJECTIVIAL) INFLECTION (ADJ-COMMON)

! FIXME: this section might need some refactoring
!! i.e. change <adj><comp><subst> to <adj><subst><comp>
!! and make use of ADJ-LEVELS class

!! LEXICON COMPARATIVE
!! 
!! %<comp%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{K%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
!! CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON A1                ! adjectives that can be both substantivised and andverbialised;
                          ! all three readings (<adj>, <adj.subst> and <adj.advl>) have comparison levels.
                          !# жақсы, тез

%<adj%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;                             !# жақсы адам
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{K%} CLITICS-INCL-COP ;   !# жақсырақ іс

%<adj%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;                             !# жақсыны таптым
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<subst%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{K%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;   !# жақсырақты таптым

%<adj%>%<advl%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;                               !# жақсы білемін
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<advl%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{K%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;     !# "...ион көп болса соғұрлым тоқ жақсырақ өтеді."

LEXICON A2                 ! (derived/not fully lexicalised) adjectives without adverbial reading;
                           ! <adj> and <adj.subst> readings have comparison levels.
                           !# ескі

%<adj%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;                             !# ескі дос
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{K%} CLITICS-INCL-COP ;   !# ескірек заманда

%<adj%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;                             !# "Ол ескіні ертеден есінде сақтаған, жаңаның жалынды жаршысы болған ақын."
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<subst%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{K%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;   !# "Ихтимал, бу бина башкасы, искерәге урынында утырадыр."

LEXICON A3                 ! (derived/not fully lexicalised) adjectives without adverbial reading,
                           ! so-called "predicatives" (бар, жоқ);
                           ! no comparison levels at all.
                           !# көктемгі, басты, бар, жоқ

%<adj%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;         !# көктемгі су тасқыны
%<adj%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;           !# "...Самаранч ең бастыны түсінді..."
                                    !# "Аты бардың заты бар."

! FIXME:NOTE:loc.attr/subst form of some of them seems to be pure overgeneration:
! e.g. *язгыдагы

LEXICON A4                 ! "pure" adjectives - no adverbial and substantive readings, no comparison levels;
                           !# ұлттық

%<adj%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;   !# ұлттық тағам

 LEXICON Adjectives
әккі:әккі A2 ; ! ""
бедеу:бедеу A2 ; ! ""
анализдік:анализдік A3 ; ! ""
желсіз:желсіз A3 ; ! ""
ұдайы:ұдайы A3 ; ! ""
ибалы:ибалы A3 ; ! ""
бірден%-бір:бірден%-бір A3 ; ! ""
бұраң:бұраң A3 ; ! ""
алаңғасар:алаңғасар A3 ; ! ""
бітіспестік:бітіспестік A3 ; ! ""
жаурынды:жаурынды A3 ; ! ""
әулие:әулие A3 ; ! ""
гүлжазира:гүлжазира A3 ; ! ""
тендерлік:тендерлік A4 ; ! ""
тауар:тауар A1 ; ! ""
ансамбльдік:ансамбльдік A3 ; ! ""
бәлекет:бәлекет A2 ; ! ""
жеркеншек:жеркеншек A1 ; ! ""
бақырауық:бақырауық A1 ; ! ""
идеялы:идеялы A1 ; ! ""
қасқа:қасқа A1 ; ! ""
күйгелек:күйгелек A1 ; ! ""
ақсақалды:ақсақалды A1 ; ! ""
жігерсіз:жігерсіз A1 ; ! ""
әмірлі:әмірлі A1 ; ! ""
еңбекші:еңбекші A1 ; ! ""
қабырғалы:қабырғалы A3 ; !
қайратсыз:қайратсыз A2 ; ! 
қанжоса:қанжоса A3 ; ! ""
қарама%-қарсы:қарама%-қарсы A1 ; ! ""
мыстас: мыстас A2; ! ""
қатпарлы:қатпарлы A2 ; ! ""
қималы:қималы A3 ; ! ""
қоздырма:қоздырма A1 ; ! ""
құба:құба A2 ; ! ""
құбырлы:құбырлы A3 ; ! ""
құштар:құштар A1 ; ! ""
құюлы:құюлы A3 ; ! ""
қызықтырарлық:қызықтырарлық A4 ; ! ""
қытырлақ:қытырлақ A2 ; ! ""
мақсаттағыдай:мақсаттағыдай A1 ; ! ""
манағы:манағы A3 ; ! ""
мас:мас A2 ; ! ""
нобайлы:нобайлы A3 ; ! ""
олақ:олақ A2 ; ! ""
өздік:өздік A4 ; ! ""
өкілетті:өкілетті A1 ; ! ""
өткендегі:өткендегі A3 ; ! ""
сасық:сасық A2 ; ! ""
секірмелі:секірмелі A3 ; ! ""
селкілдек:селкілдек A1 ; ! ""
сериялық:сериялық A4 ; ! ""
сопақ:сопақ A2 ; ! ""
тайыз:тайыз A2 ; ! ""
таңдамалы:таңдамалы A3 ; ! ""
тегістелген:тегістелген A1 ; ! ""
ұлы:ұлы A3 ; ! ""
үнемшіл:үнемшіл A1 ; ! ""
фонетикалық:фонетикалық A4 ; ! ""
бұттық:бұттық A4 ; !
пневматикалық:пневматикалық A4 ; !
агротехникалық:агротехникалық A4 ; ! ""
атомдық:атомдық A4 ; ! ""
бұқаралық:бұқаралық A4 ; ! ""
гипостильді:гипостильді A4 ; !
докторлық:докторлық A4 ; ! ""
жеңілдететін:жеңілдететін A4 ; !
императорлық:императорлық A4 ; ! ""
кезбе:кезбе A4 ; ! 
кредиттік:кредиттік A4 ; !"Use/MT"
музейлік:музейлік A4 ; ! ""
операциялық:операциялық A4 ; ! ""
пайдалы:пайдалы A2 ; ! "" A2 not A4 because пайдалысы, пайдалырақ are valid forms
реалистік:реалистік A4 ; ! ""
теңкүнді:теңкүнді A4 ; !
фольклорлық:фольклорлық A4 ; ! ""
ырза:ырза A3 ; ! "" ! A3 not A4 - subst forms found in google
эмпатикалық:эмпатикалық A4 ; !
долларлық:долларлық A4 ; ! ""
дөнен:дөнен A4 ; ! "four year old livestock"
атақты:атақты A3 ; ! ""
жылғы:жылғы A3 ; ! "year's" FIXME: GI
қосымша:қосымша A3 ; ! ""
бас:бас A3 ; ! "" ! probably not n.attr, but true null derivation
арғы:арғы A2 ; ! ""
ащы:ащы A2 ; ! ""
батпақты:батпақты A2 ; ! ""
ежелгі:ежелгі A2 ; ! ""
жаралы:жаралы A2 ; ! "injured"
кіші:кіші A2 ; ! ""
қайтымсыз:қайтымсыз A2 ; ! "irreversible" CHECK Use/MT
құнды:құнды A2 ; ! ""
мәз:мәз A2 ; ! "happy; surprised"
орташа:орташа A2 ; ! ""
төзімді:төзімді A2 ; ! ""
берік:берік A2 ; ! ""
терістік:терістік A2 ; ! "north"
оңтүстік%-шығыс:оңтүстік%-шығыс A2 ; ! "southeast"
бай:бай A1 ; ! "rich"
бөтен:бөтен A3 ; ! "other" ! was A1 -FMT
зор:зор A2 ; ! "great, huge, important" ! A2 not A1 because no ADV reading
қуанышты:қуанышты A2 ; ! "glad" ! Probably A2 not A1: no advl forms?
өзге:өзге A1 ; ! "" ! FIXME: CHECK A1
риза:риза A3 ; ! "pleased,согласный(~satisfied)" ! A3 not A1, no comp or advl forms
тиімді:тиімді A2 ; ! "appropriate" A2 not A1 because no advl reading
зарлы:зарлы A1 ; ! "sad"  ! Use/MT eng-kaz
ұлағатты:ұлағатты A1 ; !"Use/MT"
айырбасталымды:айырбасталымды A1 ; !"Use/MT"
қайтпас:қайтпас A1 ; !"Use/MT"
теңеусіз:теңеусіз A1 ; !"Use/MT"
албан:албан A3 ; !"Use/MT"
енгізілген:енгізілген A1 ; !"Use/MT"
курорттық:курорттық A1 ; !"Use/MT"
сенімсіз:сенімсіз A1 ; !"Use/MT"
сөзшең:сөзшең A4 ; !"Use/MT"
жиырылғыш:жиырылғыш A2 ; ! ""
метатұрақты:метатұрақты A4 ; !"Use/MT"
фармакологиялық:фармокологиялық A4 ; !"Use/MT"
тырысқақтық:тырысқақтық A1 ; !"Use/MT"
ротациялық:ротациялық A1 ; !"Use/MT"
әрдайым:әрдайым A1 ; !"Use/MT"
бүктелген:бүктелген A4 ; ! 
масқара:масқара A4 ; ! 
магнетиттік:магнетиттік A4 ; ! ""
антропоидты:антропоидты A4 ; !
LEXICON Guesser
сумен% қамтамасыздандырылған:сумен% қамтамасыздандырылған A1;!""
